Hawaii statutes.
§378-65 Penalties for violations. (a)
A person or public employer who violates this part shall be fined not less than
$500 nor more than $5,000 for each violation.

(b) A civil fine which is ordered pursuant to
this part shall be deposited with the director of finance to the credit of the
general fund of the State. [L 1987, c 267, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 56, §4; am L
2011, c 166, §7]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next